Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,149
Health care coverage of children; insurer of obligor; duties.

An insurer shall, in any case in which a child has health care coverage through the insurer of the obligor:

(1) Provide such information to the obligor as may be necessary for the child to obtain benefits through such coverage;

(2) Permit the obligor or the provider, with the obligor's approval, to submit claims for covered services without the approval of the obligor; and

(3) Make payment on claims submitted in accordance with subdivision (2) of this section directly to such obligor, the provider, or the department pursuant to section 68-916.

Laws 1994, LB 1224, § 77;

Laws 2002, LB 1062, § 9;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 57.